Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Amendment of Articles; Changes in Capital and Surplus.

§ 81-27-4.201.
Amendment of state trust company articles of association.

A state trust company that has been granted a charter under Section 81-27-4.105 or a predecessor statute may amend or restate its articles of association for any lawful purpose, including the creation of authorized but unissued shares or participation shares in one or more classes or series.

An amendment authorizing the issuance of shares or participation shares in series must contain:

The designation of each series and of any variations in the preferences, limitations, and relative rights among series to the extent that the preferences, limitations, and relative rights are to be established in the articles of association; and

A statement of any authority to be vested in the board to establish series and determine the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of each series.

Deliver a certified copy of the amendment or restatement to the state trust company.

A limited liability trust company may not amend its articles of association to extend its period of existence for a perpetual period or for any period of years, unless the period of existence is expressly contingent on those events resulting in dissolution of the limited liability trust company under subarticle B of Article 8 of this chapter.

Amendment or restatement of the articles of association of a state trust company and approval of the board and shareholders or participants must be made or obtained in accordance with provisions of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act for the amendment or restatement of articles of incorporation except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules or regulations adopted under this chapter. The original and one (1) copy of the articles of amendment or restated articles of association must be filed with the commissioner for approval. Unless the submission presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall approve or reject the amendment or restatement not later than the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner considers the submission informationally complete and accepted for filing. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision to approve or reject any amendment or restatement or articles of association under this section.

If the commissioner thinks that the amendment or restatement conforms to law and any conditions imposed by the commissioner, and any required filing fee has been paid, the commissioner shall:

Endorse the face of the original and copy with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;

File the original in the department’s records; and

An amendment or restatement, if approved, takes effect on the date of approval, unless the amendment or restatement provides for a different effective date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.202.
Establishing a series of shares or participation shares.

If the articles of association expressly give the board authority to establish series and determine the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of each series, the board may do so only on compliance with this section and any rules adopted under this article.

A series of shares or participation shares may be established in the manner provided by the provisions of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act as if the state trust company were a domestic corporation, but the shares or participation shares of the series may not be issued and sold except upon compliance with this section. The state trust company shall file the original and one (1) copy of the statement of action required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act with the commissioner. Unless the submission presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall approve or reject the series not later than the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner considers the submission informationally complete and accepted for filing. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

If the commissioner finds that the interests of the clients and creditors of the state trust company will not be adversely affected by the series, that the series otherwise conforms to law and any conditions imposed by the commissioner, and that any required filing fee has been paid, the commissioner shall:

Endorse the face of the original and copy of the statement with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;

File the original in the department’s records; and

Deliver a certified copy of the statement to the state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.203.
Change in outstanding capital and surplus.

A state trust company may not reduce or increase its outstanding capital through dividend, redemption, issuance of shares or participation shares, or otherwise, without the prior approval of the commissioner, except as permitted by this section or rules adopted under this article.

Unless otherwise restricted by rules or regulations, prior approval is not required for an increase in capital accomplished through:

Issuance of shares of common stock or their equivalent in participation shares for cash;

Declaration and payment of pro rata share dividends as defined in the Mississippi Business Corporation Act; or

Adoption by the board of a resolution directing that all or part of undivided profits be transferred to capital.

Prior approval is not required for a decrease in surplus caused by incurred losses in excess of undivided profits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.204.
Capital notes or debentures.

With the prior written approval of the commissioner, any state trust company may, at any time, through action of its board, and without requiring action of its shareholders or participants, issue and sell its capital notes or debentures, which must be subordinate to the claims or depositories and may be subordinate to other claims, including the claims of other creditors or classes of creditors or the shareholders or participants.

Capital notes or debentures may be convertible into shares or participation shares of any class or series. The issuance and sale of convertible capital notes or debentures are subject to satisfaction of preemptive rights, if any, to the extent provided by law.

Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, interest due or principal repayable on outstanding capital notes or debentures may not be paid by a state trust company when the state trust company is in hazardous condition or insolvent, as determined by the commissioner, or to the extent that payment will cause the state trust company to be in hazardous condition or insolvent.

The amount of any outstanding capital notes or debentures that meet the requirements of this section and that are subordinated to unsecured creditors of the state trust company may be included in equity capital of the state trust company for purposes of determining hazardous condition or insolvency, and for such other purposes provided by rules or regulations adopted under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.